Massachusetts, session 194th, S1235.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6E of the General Laws is amended by adding the following sentence after the
second sentence in sec.10(f):
“For all decisions of the Commission resulting in suspensions in excess of 2 weeks or
decertification, the CH.30A appeal shall include a de novo review.”
of 1